Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 4
ELECTION JUDGES

1-13.5-401. Appointment of election judges.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at least fifteen days before each local government election, the governing body shall appoint the election judges.

Each election judge must be registered to vote in Colorado and at least eighteen years of age. Election judges must be appointed pursuant to this article without regard to party affiliation. Neither a current candidate for director nor any immediate family member, to the second degree, of such candidate is eligible to serve as an election judge.

The designated election official shall make and file in his or her office a list of all individuals so appointed, giving their names and addresses. The list is a public record and is subject to inspection and examination during office hours by any elector of the local government with the right to make copies thereof.

The governing body may delegate to the designated election official the authority and responsibility to appoint election judges in the manner provided in this section.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 14, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1267, § 4, effective August 10.

1-13.5-402. Number of judges - appointment.

The governing body, or the designated election official if authorized pursuant to section 1-13.5-401 (2), shall appoint at least two election judges for each local government election. The appointing authority may also appoint any additional judges as deemed necessary, and may appoint counting judges.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 15, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-403. Certificates of appointment.

Promptly after the appointment of the election judges, the designated election official shall issue certificates certifying the appointments. The designated election official shall mail one certificate to each person appointed.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 15, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-404. Acceptance form - time to file.

With each certificate of appointment transmitted to the election judges, the designated election official shall enclose a form for acceptance of the appointment. Each individual appointed as an election judge may file his or her acceptance form in the office of the designated election official within seven days after the date that the designated election official mailed the certificate of appointment and the acceptance form. Unless otherwise determined by the designated election official, failure of any person appointed as an election judge to file an acceptance within those seven days results in a vacancy, which shall be filled in the same way the original appointment was made.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 15, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-405. Vacancies - emergency appointments.

Except when section 1-13.5-404 applies, if an individual appointed as an election judge refuses or fails to accept the appointment or is unable to serve, the individual or any other election judge must immediately notify the designated election official. The designated election official shall forthwith appoint another qualified individual to serve as election judge in the place of the individual. In the event of an emergency, including inability to notify the designated election official, the remaining election judges at the location where the individual was to serve may appoint a replacement election judge.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 15, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-406. Removal of judges.

The designated election official may summarily remove any election judge who neglects his or her duty, or commits, encourages, or connives at any fraud in connection therewith, or violates any election laws, or knowingly permits others to do so, or has been convicted of any felony, or violates his or her oath, or commits any act that interferes or tends to interfere with a fair and honest election. An election judge has no cause of action against a local government or designated election official arising from removal from office pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 15, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-407. Oath of judges.

Before any votes are taken at any local government election, the election judges shall make a self-affirmation substantially in the following form:

I, ...., do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I am a citizen of the United States and the state of Colorado; that I am a registered elector in Colorado; that I will perform the duties of election judge according to law and the best of my ability; that I will studiously endeavor to prevent fraud, deceit, and abuse in conducting the same; that I will not try to ascertain how any elector voted, nor will I disclose how any elector voted if, in the discharge of my duties as judge, such knowledge shall come to me, unless called upon to disclose the same before some court; and that I will not disclose the result of the votes until the polls have closed.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 16, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-408. Training of judges.

The designated election official shall make available an instruction class concerning the tasks of an election judge not more than forty-five days prior to each election. A designated election official shall remove an election judge who fails or refuses to attend the instruction class.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 16, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-409. Compensation of judges.

The election judges at any local government election shall receive reasonable compensation for their services as election judges on election day and additional reasonable compensation for attending an instruction class required in section 1-13.5-408, as determined by the governing body of the local government or designated election official if authorized by the governing body to make a reasonable determination.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 16, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-410. Compensation for delivery of election returns and other election papers.

The election judges in each polling place shall select one of their number to deliver the election returns, registration list, property owners list, ballot boxes, if any, and other election papers and supplies to the office of the designated election official or to such other place as the designated election official may designate as the counting center. The judge so selected shall be paid a reasonable amount of compensation for the performance of such service.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 16, § 6, effective February 18.